Georgia statutes. TITLE 6 Aviation
CHAPTER 4 Georgia Airport Development Authority

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall not be effective until such time as the ‘State Airport System Plan’ has been completed by the Department of Transportation.”

The State Airport System plan referred to in Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 3, was completed by 1995. A subsequent Aviation System Plan was completed and approved by the Federal Aviation Administration on July 15, 2003.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 amendment of this chapter, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 149 (1992).

6-4-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Airport Development Authority Law.”

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-2.
Authority created; purposes.

There is created the Georgia Airport Development Authority for the purposes of determination of location, construction, financing, acquisition of property, operation, and development of any new airports that are planned to accommodate aircraft operating under the provisions of 14 C.F.R. Part 121 within and outside the State of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-3.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Authority” means the Georgia Airport Development Authority.

“Cost of the project” or “cost of any project” means and shall include: all costs of acquisition, by purchase or otherwise, construction, assembly, installation, or the subsequent modification, renovation, or rehabilitation incurred in connection with any project or any part of any project; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, fees, franchises, permits, approvals, licenses, and certifications acquired; the cost of all machinery and equipment necessary for the operation of the project; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for such period of time after completion of construction as shall be deemed necessary to allow the earnings of the project to become sufficient to meet the requirements of the bond issue; the cost of engineering, legal expenses, plans and specifications, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this chapter; the construction of any project, and the placing of same in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds issued for such project under this chapter.

“Governing body” means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing authority of the State of Georgia.

“Project” means the construction, installation, operation, or lease of any new airports in the state that are planned to be certificated under 14 C.F.R. Part 139 or any appurtenance thereto or the subsequent renovation or rehabilitation of such facility. A project may also include any fixtures, machinery, or equipment used on or in connection with any airport facilities.

“Revenue bonds” and “bonds” means any bonds of the authority which are authorized to be issued under the Constitution and laws of the State of Georgia, including refunding bonds but not including notes or other obligations of an authority.

“Self-liquidating” means that, in the judgment of the authority, the revenues and earnings to be derived by the authority from any project or combination of projects, together with any maintenance, repair, operational services, funds, rights of way, engineering services, and any other in-kind services to be received by the authority from appropriations of the General Assembly, other state agencies or authorities, the United States government, or any county or municipality shall be sufficient to provide for the maintenance, repair, and operation and to pay the principal and interest of revenue bonds which may be issued for the cost of such project, projects, or combination of projects.

“Service area” means the geographical area of operations of the authority and shall consist of the State of Georgia and, with the consent of the appropriate governing authorities thereof, nearby states.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-4.
Corporate existence; status as political subdivision.

The Georgia Airport Development Authority shall continue to be a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality and public corporation of the state known as the “Georgia Airport Development Authority.”
It shall have perpetual existence. In said name it may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts of this state, subject to the limitations of Code Section 6-4-15.
The authority shall constitute a political subdivision within the meaning of Code Section 6-3-22 as enacted by the Georgia General Assembly in its 1992 regular session in Senate Bill 173.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-5.
Appointment of members; terms; filling of vacancies; officers; quorum; reimbursement for expenses; compensation of employees; legal services.

The authority shall consist of eight members as follows:

Five members to be appointed by the Governor, at least three of whom shall have expertise in the field of aviation;

One member to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall not be a member of the General Assembly;

One member to be appointed by the President of the Senate, who shall not be a member of the General Assembly; and

The commissioner of transportation, who shall serve as chairman.

Two members appointed by the Governor and the members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of the Senate shall serve for initial terms of two years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.
The remaining members appointed by the Governor shall serve for initial terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Thereafter, all members shall serve for terms of four years and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any vacancy among the members so appointed, whether caused by expiration of term, death, resignation, or otherwise, shall be filled in the same manner as the membership position so vacated was last regularly filled.
When the vacancy occurs other than by expiration of term, it shall be filled for the unexpired term and until a successor is appointed and qualified.

The authority shall elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not necessarily be members of the authority. A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted to the authority by this chapter. The chairman shall vote only in the event of a tie.

No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to transact any and all business as stated in this Code section. If any member of the authority has any pecuniary interest in a project, the fact of such interest shall be disclosed by such member and recorded in the minutes of the authority. The member shall abstain from urging the approval of or voting on any project in which the member has a pecuniary interest.

The members of the authority shall receive no compensation for their services but all members shall be entitled to the expense allowance and travel cost reimbursement provided for members of certain boards and commissions pursuant to Code Section 45-7-21 while in the performance of their duties. Employees of the authority shall receive reasonable compensation for their services, the amount to be determined by the members of the authority.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the authority. In connection therewith, Code Sections 45-15-13 through 45-15-16 shall be fully applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-6.
Members accountable as trustees; conflict of interests; books and records.

The members of the authority shall be accountable in all respects as trustees.

Every member of the authority and every employee of the authority who knowingly has any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract to which the authority is or is about to become a party, or in any other business of the authority, or in any firm or corporation doing business with the authority, shall make full disclosure of such interest to the authority. Failure to disclose such an interest shall constitute cause for which an authority member may be removed or an employee discharged or otherwise disciplined at the discretion of the authority.

Provisions of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 and Code Sections 16-10-21 and 16-10-22, regulating the conduct of officers, employees, and agents of political subdivisions, municipal and other public corporations, and other public organizations, shall be applicable to the conduct of members, officers, employees, and agents of the authority.

Any contract or transaction of the authority involving a conflict of interest not disclosed under subsection (b) of this Code section, or involving a violation of Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 16 and Code Sections 16-10-21 and 16-10-22, or involving a violation of any other provision of law regulating conflicts of interest which is applicable to the authority or its members, officers, or employees shall be voidable by the authority.

The authority shall keep suitable and proper books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of every kind and shall submit for inspection all of such books, together with a proper statement of the authority’s financial position, on or about December 31 of each year, to the state auditor.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-7.
General powers.

The authority shall have all of the powers necessary, proper, or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter.
The powers enumerated in this Code section are cumulative of and in addition to each other and other powers granted elsewhere in this chapter and no such power limits or restricts any other power of the authority. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the powers of the authority shall include the powers:

To bring and defend actions;

To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

To make and execute contracts, agreements, and other instruments necessary, proper, or convenient to exercise the powers of the authority and to further the public purpose for which the authority is created, including, but not limited to, contracts for construction of projects, leases of projects, operation of projects, sale of projects, agreements for loans to finance projects, and contracts with respect to the use of projects, including negotiated contracts with air carriers for the use of projects;

To plan, survey, subdivide, improve, administer, construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, remodel, maintain, add to, extend, improve, equip, operate, and manage projects, as defined in Code Section 6-4-3, to be located on property owned or leased by the authority; the cost of any such project shall be paid from its income, from any grant from the United States government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any grant from this state;

In connection with any project, to acquire by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of real and personal property of every kind and character or any interest therein in furtherance of its corporate purposes;

In connection with any project, to acquire in its own name by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper or by condemnation in accordance with any and all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, real property or rights or easements therein or franchises necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes; and to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue and to lease or make contracts with respect to the use of or to dispose of the same in any manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority, the authority being under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this chapter or under Code Section 6-2-20 except from the funds provided under the authority of this chapter; and, in any proceedings to condemn, such order may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the action or proceedings as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned; and no property shall be acquired under this chapter upon which any lien or other encumbrance exists unless at the time such property is so acquired a sufficient sum of money be deposited in trust to pay and redeem such lien or encumbrance in full;

To adopt regulations and fix, alter, charge, negotiate, and collect fares, rates, fees, tolls, and other charges for the use of such projects; fix penalties for the violation of said regulations; and establish liens to enforce payment of said charges, fees, and tolls, subject to existing contracts; to make such contracts, leases, or conveyances as the legitimate and necessary purposes of this chapter shall require, including, but not limited to, contracts with private parties for the operation or lease or assignment to private parties for operation, space, area, improvements, and equipment on such projects, provided in each case that in so doing the public is not deprived of its rightful, equal, and uniform use thereof;

To finance, by loan, grant, lease, or otherwise, and to construct, erect, assemble, purchase, acquire, own, repair, remodel, renovate, rehabilitate, modify, maintain, extend, improve, install, sell, equip, expand, add to, operate, or manage projects and to pay the cost of any project from the proceeds of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority or any other funds of the authority or from any contributions or loans by persons, corporations, partnerships, limited or general, or other entities, all of which the authority is empowered to receive, accept, and use;

To borrow money to further or to carry out its public purpose and to execute revenue bonds, notes, other obligations, leases, trust indentures, trust agreements, agreements for the sale of its revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations, loan agreements, mortgages, deeds to secure debt, trust deeds, security agreements, assignments, and such other agreements or instruments as may be necessary or desirable, in the judgment of the authority, to evidence and to provide security for such borrowing;

To accept loans and grants, either or both, of money, materials, or property of any kind from the United States government or the State of Georgia or any political subdivision, authority, agency, or instrumentality of either of them, upon such terms and conditions as the United States government or the State of Georgia or such political subdivision, authority, agency, or instrumentality of either of them shall impose;

To hold, use, administer, and expend such sum or sums as may hereafter be received as income or gifts or as may be appropriated by authority of the General Assembly for any of the purposes of the authority;

To issue revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority and use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying or loaning the proceeds thereof to pay all or any part of the cost of any project and otherwise to further or carry out the public purpose of the authority and to pay all costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, furthering or carrying out such purpose;

To make application directly or indirectly to any federal, state, county, or municipal government or agency or to any other source, public or private, for loans, grants, guarantees, or other financial assistance in furtherance of the authority’s public purposes and to accept and use the same upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by such federal, state, county, or municipal government or agency or other source;

To enter into agreements with the federal government or any agency or corporation thereof to use the facilities of the federal government or agency or corporation thereof in order to further or carry out the public purposes of the authority;

To extend credit or make loans to any person, corporation, partnership, limited or general, or other entity for the costs of any project, which credit or loans may be evidenced or secured by loan agreements, notes, mortgages, deeds to secure debt, trust deeds, security agreements, assignments, or other instruments or by rentals, revenues, fees, or charges, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine to be reasonable in connection with such extension of credit or loans, including provision for the establishment and maintenance of reserve funds, and, in the exercise of powers granted in connection with any project, the authority shall have the right and power to require the inclusion in any such loan agreement, note, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, assignment, or other instrument of such provisions or requirements for guarantee of any obligations, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project and such other terms and conditions as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

As security for repayment of any revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority, to pledge, mortgage, convey, assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property of the authority, including, but not limited to, real property, fixtures, personal property, and revenues or other funds; and to execute any lease, trust indenture, trust agreement, agreement for the sale of the authority’s revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations, loan agreement, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, assignment, or other agreement or instrument as may be necessary or desirable in the judgment of the authority to secure any such revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations, which instruments or agreements may provide for foreclosure or forced sale of any property of the authority upon default in any obligation of the authority, either in payment of principal, premium, if any, or interest or in the performance of any term or condition contained in any such agreement or instrument. The State of Georgia on behalf of itself and each county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district therein waives any right the state or such county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing jurisdiction may have to prevent the forced sale or foreclosure of any property of the authority upon such default and agrees that any agreement or instrument encumbering such property may be foreclosed in accordance with law and terms thereof;

To receive and use the proceeds of any tax levied by the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof to pay the costs of any project or for any other purpose for which the authority may use its own funds pursuant to this chapter;

To receive and administer gifts, grants, and devises of money and property of any kind and to administer trusts;

To use any real property, personal property, or fixtures or any interest therein; to rent or lease such property to or from others or make contracts with respect to the use thereof; or to sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or grant options for any such property in any manner as it deems to be to the best advantage of the authority and the public purpose thereof;

To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interests in any real property, personal property, or fixtures by loan agreement, note, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, assignment, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer in order to secure the repayment of any moneys loaned or credit extended by the authority;

To appoint, select, and employ officers, agents, and employees, including engineers, surveyors, architects, urban or city planners, construction experts, fiscal agents, attorneys, and others and to fix their compensation and pay their expenses;

To make, contract for, or otherwise cause to be made long-range plans or proposals for projects authorized in Code Section 6-4-2 within the service area, in cooperation with those political subdivisions within which such projects are located or are proposed to be located;

By or through its authorized agents or employees, to enter upon any lands, waters, and premises in the state for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as the authority may deem necessary or convenient for the purposes of this chapter; and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass. The authority shall, however, make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from such activities;

To make reasonable regulations for installation, construction, maintenance, repairs, renewal, and relocation of pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility in, on, along, over, or under any project;

To exercise any power granted by laws of the State of Georgia to public or private corporations which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of Georgia; and

To do all things necessary, proper, or convenient to carry out the powers conferred by this chapter, including the adoption of rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-8.
Requirements for issuance of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations.

Revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by an authority shall be paid solely from the property, including, but not limited to, real property, fixtures, personal property, revenues, or other funds pledged, mortgaged, conveyed, assigned, hypothecated, or otherwise encumbered to secure or to pay such bonds, notes, or other obligations.
All revenue bonds, notes, and other obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the authority, adopted by a majority vote of the members of the authority at a regular or special meeting. Such revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations shall bear such date or dates, shall mature at such time or times not more than 40 years from their respective dates, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, which may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time, shall be subject to redemption on such terms, and shall contain such other terms, provisions, covenants, assignments, and conditions as the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, notes, or other obligations may permit or provide.
The terms, provisions, covenants, assignments, and conditions contained in or provided or permitted by any resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of such revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations shall bind the members of the authority then in office and their successors. The authority shall have the power from time to time and whenever it deems refunding expedient to refund any bonds by the issuance of new bonds, whether the bonds to be refunded have or have not matured, and may issue partly to refund bonds then outstanding and partly for any other purpose permitted under this chapter.
The refunding bonds may be exchanged for the bonds to be refunded with such cash adjustments as may be agreed upon or may be sold and the proceeds applied to the purchase or redemption of the bonds to be refunded.
There shall be no limitation upon the amount of revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations which the authority may issue. Any limitations with respect to interest rates or any maximum interest rate or rates found in the usury laws of the State of Georgia, or any other laws of the State of Georgia, shall not apply to revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations of the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-9.
Additional provisions governing issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations.

Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the agreements or instruments executed by the authority may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the members of the authority.

The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds, notes, and other obligations issued by the authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this chapter, all or part of the cost of any project or for the purpose of refunding any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Issuance by the authority of one or more series of bonds, notes, or other obligations for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds, notes, or other obligations in connection with the same project or with any other projects, but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds, notes, or other obligations shall be issued shall recognize and protect any prior loan agreement, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, or other agreement or instrument made for any prior issue of bonds, notes, or other obligations unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds, notes, or other obligations on a parity with such prior issue.

The authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever bonds of the authority shall have been validated as provided in this chapter, to issue from time to time its notes in anticipation of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue such bond anticipation notes only to provide funds which otherwise would be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. Such notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any resolution or resolutions authorizing bonds of the authority or any issue thereof and which the authority is authorized to include in any bonds. Validations of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of such notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

All bonds issued by the authority under this chapter shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of Title 36, the “Revenue Bond Law,” as heretofore and hereafter amended, except as provided in this chapter, provided that notes and other obligations of the authority may be, but shall not be required to be, so validated.

The authority shall determine the form of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest thereof, which may be at any bank or trust company within or outside the state. The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form or both, as the authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bond as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest.

All bonds shall be signed by the chairman of the authority, and the official seal of the authority shall be affixed thereto and attested by the secretary of the authority, and any coupons attached thereto shall bear the signature or facsimile signature of the chairman of the authority. Any coupon may bear the facsimile signature of such person, and any bond may be signed, sealed, and attested on behalf of the authority by such person as at the actual time of the execution of such bonds shall be duly authorized to hold the proper office although at the date of such bonds such person may not have been so authorized or shall not have held such office. In case any officer whose signature shall appear on any bonds or whose facsimile signature shall appear on any coupon shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if such officer had remained in office until such delivery.

In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which bonds to be issued by the authority are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General, the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing, and the petition and complaint for validation may state that the bonds when issued will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a maximum per annum rate of interest, which may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time, specified in such notices and petition and complaint or that, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate which may be fixed or may fluctuate or otherwise change from time to time so specified; provided, however, that nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rates specified in such notices and in the petition and complaint.

The authority may also provide for the replacement of any bond which becomes mutilated or which is destroyed or lost.

The issuance of any bond, revenue bond, note, or other obligation or the incurring of any debt by the authority must, prior to such occurrence, be approved by the Georgia State Financing and Investment Commission established by Article VII, Section IV, Paragraph VII of the Constitution of the State of Georgia of 1983 or its successor.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-10.
Development of air transportation projects.

The implementation of new air transportation projects that are planned to accommodate 14 C.F.R. Part 121 aircraft operations within the State of Georgia develops and promotes for the public good and general welfare, trade, commerce, tourism, industry, and employment opportunities and promotes the general welfare of the state by creating a favorable climate for the location of new industry, trade, and commerce and the development of existing industry, trade, and commerce within the State of Georgia.
It is therefore in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of Georgia and it is declared to be the public purpose of this chapter to so develop such air transportation projects within this state.
No bonds, notes, or other obligations, except refunding bonds, shall be issued by the authority pursuant to this chapter unless its membership adopts a resolution finding that the project for which such bonds, notes, or other obligations are to be issued will promote the foregoing objectives.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-11.
Liberal construction of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall be liberally construed to effect its stated purpose.
The offer, sale, or issuance of bonds, notes, or other obligations by the authority shall not be subject to regulation under the laws of the State of Georgia regulating the sale of securities, as heretofore and hereafter amended.
No notice, proceeding, or publication except those required by this chapter shall be necessary to the performance of any act authorized by this chapter nor shall any such act be subject to referendum.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-12.
Obligations or indebtedness not to constitute indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

No bonds, notes, or other obligations of and no indebtedness incurred by the authority shall constitute an indebtedness or obligation of the State of Georgia or any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof nor shall any act of the authority in any manner constitute or result in the creation of an indebtedness of the state or any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision.
No holder or holders of any such bonds, notes, or other obligations shall ever have the right to compel any exercise of the taxing power of the state or any county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision thereof nor to enforce the payment thereof against the state or any such county, municipal corporation, or political subdivision; and all such bonds shall contain recitals on their face covering substantially the foregoing provisions of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-13.
Tax exemption.

It is found, determined, and declared that the creation of the Georgia Airport Development Authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and constitute a public purpose and that the authority will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this chapter.
The authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of the facilities erected, maintained, or acquired by it nor upon any fees, rentals, or other charges for the use of such facilities or other income received by the authority. The state covenants with the holders from time to time of the bonds, notes, and other obligations issued under this chapter that the authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or taxing districts on any property acquired by the authority or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or leased by it to others or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any such property or on any income derived by the authority in the form of fees, recording fees, rentals, charges, purchase price, installments, or otherwise, and that the bonds, notes, and other obligations of the authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-14.
Police powers.

The authority is empowered to exercise such of the police powers of the state as may be necessary to maintain peace and order and to enforce any and all restrictions upon its properties and facilities, to the extent that such is lawful under the laws of the United States and this state; however, the authority may delegate the exercise of this function for a time or permanently to the state or to the county in which its projects are located.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-15.
Other authorities unaffected by provisions of chapter.

This chapter shall not affect any other authority now or hereafter existing under general or local constitutional amendment or general or local law.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.

6-4-16.
Venue and jurisdiction of actions.

Any action to protect or enforce any rights under this chapter and any action pertaining to validation of any bonds issued under this chapter brought in the courts of this state shall be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County, which shall have exclusive jurisdiction of such actions.

History.

Code 1981, §

6-4-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1615, § 1.